South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5272.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 34 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 34-3-120.  A financial institution shall verify if an individual is a citizen of the United States before wiring or remitting funds to a foreign country. If the individual is not a United States citizen, the financial institution shall either prohibit the transfer of funds or shall charge a fee of one thousand dollars which must be remitted to the general fund of the State. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----